Alaska statutes. Title 33. Probation, Prisons, Pardons, and Prisoners.
Chapter 16. Parole Administration.
Sec. 33.16.140.
Order for parole.

An order for parole issued by the board, setting out the conditions imposed under AS

33.16.150(a)

and (b) and the date parole custody ends, shall be furnished to each prisoner released on special medical, discretionary, or mandatory parole.

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 1985; am § 6 ch 70 SLA 1995; am § 134 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 54 ch 1 4SSLA 2017)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(m)(7), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For discretionary parole release hearings, see 22 AAC 20, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, inserted “administrative,” following “special medical,".

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, deleted “administrative,” following “special medical,”.

Sec. 33.16.150.
Conditions of parole.

As a condition of parole, a prisoner released on special medical, discretionary, or mandatory parole

shall obey all state, federal, or local laws or ordinances, and any court orders applicable to the parolee;

shall make diligent efforts to maintain steady employment or meet family obligations;

shall, if involved in education, counseling, training, or treatment, continue in the program unless granted permission from the parole officer assigned to the parolee to discontinue the program;

shall report

upon release to the parole officer assigned to the parolee;

at other times, and in the manner, prescribed by the board or the parole officer assigned to the parolee that accommodate the diligent efforts of the parolee to secure and maintain steady employment or to participate in educational courses or training programs;

shall reside at a stated place and not change that residence without notifying, and receiving permission from, the parole officer assigned to the parolee;

shall remain within stated geographic limits unless written permission to depart from the stated limits is granted the parolee;

may not use, possess, handle, purchase, give, distribute, or administer a controlled substance as defined in AS

11.71.900

or under federal law or a drug for which a prescription is required under state or federal law without a prescription from a licensed medical professional to the parolee;

may not possess or control a firearm; in this paragraph, “firearm” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

;

may not enter into an agreement or other arrangement with a law enforcement agency or officer that will place the parolee in the position of violating a law or parole condition without the prior approval of the board;

may not contact or correspond with anyone confined in a correctional facility of any type serving any term of imprisonment or a felon without the permission of the parole officer assigned to a parolee;

shall agree to waive extradition from any state or territory of the United States and to not contest efforts to return the parolee to the state;

shall provide a blood sample, an oral sample, or both, when requested by a health care professional acting on behalf of the state to provide the sample or samples, or an oral sample when requested by a juvenile or adult correctional, probation, or parole officer, or a peace officer, if the prisoner is being released after a conviction of an offense requiring the state to collect the sample or samples for the deoxyribonucleic acid identification registration system under AS 41.41.035;

from a conviction for a sex offense shall submit to regular periodic polygraph examinations; in this paragraph, “sex offense” has the meaning given in AS

12.63.100

.

The board may require as a condition of special medical, discretionary, or mandatory parole, or a member of the board acting for the board under (e) of this section may require as a condition of mandatory parole, that a prisoner released on parole

not possess or control a defensive weapon, a deadly weapon other than an ordinary pocket knife with a blade three inches or less in length, or ammunition for a firearm, or reside in a residence where there is a firearm capable of being concealed on one’s person or a prohibited weapon; in this paragraph, “deadly weapon,” “defensive weapon,” and “firearm” have the meanings given in AS

11.81.900

, and “prohibited weapon” has the meaning given in AS

11.61.200

;

refrain from possessing or consuming alcoholic beverages;

submit to reasonable searches and seizures by a parole officer, or a peace officer acting under the direction of a parole officer;

submit to appropriate medical, mental health, or controlled substance or alcohol examination, treatment, or counseling;

submit to periodic examinations designed to detect the use of alcohol or controlled substances; the periodic examinations may include testing under the program established under AS

33.16.060(c)

;

make restitution ordered by the court according to a schedule established by the board;

refrain from opening, maintaining, or using a checking account or charge account;

refrain from entering into a contract other than a prenuptial contract or a marriage contract;

refrain from operating a motor vehicle;

refrain from entering an establishment where alcoholic beverages are served, sold, or otherwise dispensed;

refrain from participating in any other activity or conduct reasonably related to the parolee’s offense, prior record, behavior or prior behavior, current circumstances, or perceived risk to the community, or from associating with any other person that the board determines is reasonably likely to diminish the rehabilitative goals of parole, or that may endanger the public; in the case of special medical parole, for a prisoner diagnosed with a communicable disease, comply with conditions set by the board designed to prevent the transmission of the disease;

refrain from traveling in the state to make diligent efforts to secure or maintain steady employment or to participate in educational courses or training programs only if the travel violates other conditions of parole.

Except for a condition imposed under (b)(1) and (3) — (6) of this section, the board, or a member of the board acting for the board under (e) of this section, may generally delegate imposition of special conditions under (b) of this section to the discretion of the parole officer.

The board, or a member of the board acting for the board under (e) of this section, may require a prisoner released on parole to comply with special conditions imposed under (b) of this section for any period up to the maximum term under which the prisoner is subject to the custody and jurisdiction of the board.

The board may designate a member of the board to act on behalf of the board in imposing conditions of mandatory parole under (a) and (b) of this section, in delegating imposition of conditions of mandatory parole under (c) of this section, and in setting the period of compliance with the conditions of mandatory parole under (d) of this section. The decision of a member of the board under this section is the decision of the board. A prisoner or parolee aggrieved by a decision of a member of the board acting for the board under this subsection may apply to the board under AS

33.16.160

for a change in the conditions of mandatory parole.

In addition to other conditions of parole imposed under this section, the board may impose as a condition of special medical, discretionary, or mandatory parole for a prisoner serving a term for a crime involving domestic violence (1) any of the terms of protective orders under AS

18.66.100(c)(1)

— (7); (2) a requirement that, at the prisoner’s expense, the prisoner participate in and complete, to the satisfaction of the board, a program for the rehabilitation of perpetrators of domestic violence that meets the standards set by, and that is approved by, the department under AS

44.28.020(b)

; and (3) any other condition necessary to rehabilitate the prisoner. The board shall establish procedures for the exchange of information concerning the parolee with the victim and for responding to reports of nonattendance or noncompliance by the parolee with conditions imposed under this subsection. The board may not under this subsection require a prisoner to participate in and complete a program for the rehabilitation of perpetrators of domestic violence unless the program meets the standards set by, and is approved by, the department under AS

44.28.020(b)

.

In addition to other conditions of parole imposed under this section for a prisoner serving a sentence for an offense where the aggravating factor provided in AS

12.55.155(c)(29)

has been proven or admitted, the board shall impose as a condition of special medical, discretionary, and mandatory parole a requirement that the prisoner submit to electronic monitoring. Electronic monitoring under this subsection must comply with AS

33.30.011(a)(10)

and provide for monitoring of the prisoner’s location and movements by Global Positioning System technology. The board shall require a prisoner serving a period of parole with electronic monitoring as provided under this subsection to pay all or a portion of the costs of the electronic monitoring, but only if the prisoner has sufficient financial resources to pay the costs or a portion of the costs. A prisoner subject to electronic monitoring under this subsection is not entitled to a credit for time served in a correctional facility while the defendant is on parole. In this subsection, “correctional facility” has the meaning given in AS

33.30.901

.

In addition to other conditions of parole imposed under this section, for a prisoner serving a sentence for an offense involving the use of alcohol or controlled substances, the board may impose, as a condition of special medical, discretionary, or mandatory parole, a requirement that the prisoner comply with a program established under AS

33.16.060(c)

or AS

47.38.020

. The board may require a prisoner serving a period of parole and complying with a program established under AS

33.16.060(c)

or AS

47.38.020

to pay all or a portion of the costs associated with the program.

In addition to other conditions of parole imposed under this section, for a prisoner who is serving a sentence for an offense involving the use of alcohol and whom the board has ordered to refrain from possessing or consuming alcoholic beverages, the board shall require the surrender of the person’s driver’s license or identification card, forward the license or identification card to the department, and impose as a condition of parole that, if the parolee is eligible for a driver’s license or identification card, the parolee shall apply to the department for a new license or identification card with a restriction imposed on the person under AS

04.16.160

. The board shall notify the department of the board’s order under this subsection by providing a copy of the board’s order. Upon discharge from parole, the board shall notify the department of the parolee’s discharge. In this subsection, “department” means the Department of Administration.

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 1985; am § 16 ch 59 SLA 1989; am §§ 3, 4 ch 44 SLA 1994; am §§ 7, 8 ch 70 SLA 1995; am § 52 ch 64 SLA 1996; am § 15 ch 86 SLA 1998; am § 7 ch 95 SLA 1998; am § 4 ch 44 SLA 2000; am § 10 ch 14 SLA 2006; am § 2 ch 27 SLA 2007; am § 30 ch 83 SLA 2014; am §§ 135 — 140 ch 36 SLA 2016; am §§
2, 3 ch 49 SLA 2016; am §§ 55 — 60 ch 1 4SSLA 2017)

Revisor’s notes. —

Section 11, ch. 43, SLA 1994 added a new subsection (e) for this section, which was superseded by the enactment of a substantially similar provision in § 4, ch. 44, SLA 1994, which took effect the day after ch. 43. Under § 14, ch. 43, SLA 1994, the subsection added by ch. 43 was retroactive to January 1, 1986. It read as follows: “(e) The board may delegate its authority under this section to a single member of the board to issue a decision or order on behalf of the board setting special conditions of mandatory parole. A prisoner or parolee aggrieved by a decision or order of a single board member under this section may request a change in mandatory parole conditions by applying to the full board under AS

33.16.160

.”

Cross references. —

For provision authorizing the board of parole to adopt regulations necessary to implement (b) of this section, see sec. 39(b), ch. 83, SLA 2014.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(m)(8) - (13), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For attendance and appearance at parole board adjudicatory hearings, see 22 AAC 20, art. 2.

For discretionary parole release hearings, see 22 AAC 20, art. 4.

For conditions of parole, see 22 AAC 20, art. 5.

For discretionary parole release procedures, see 22 AAC 20, art. 6.

For mandatory parole release and revocation, see 22 AAC 20, art. 7.

For parole violations, see 22 AAC 20, art. 12.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, in (b)(5), added “the periodic examinations may include testing under the program established under AS

33.16.060(c)

;” at the end.

The first 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a) inserted “administrative,” following “special medical,”; in (b), inserted “administrative” in two places; in (e), inserted “administrative or” in four places; in (f), inserted “administrative” following “special medical,”; in (g), inserted “administrative” following “special medical,”; inserted “comply with AS

33.30.011(a)(10)

and” following “subsection must”; substituted “parole” for “probation”; added (h) and (i).

The second 2016 amendment, effective October 26, 2016, in (a)(4)(B), added “that accommodate the diligent efforts of the parolee to secure and maintain steady employment or to participate in educational courses or training programs” at the end of the sentence; added (b)(12).

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, deleted “administrative,” following “special medical,” in the introductory language in (a) and (b), and in (f), (g), and (h); in the introductory language in (b), and three times in (e), it deleted “administrative or” preceding “mandatory parole”.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 36(b), ch. 83, SLA 2014, subsection (b) as amended by sec. 30, ch. 83, SLA 2014, applies to convictions occurring before, on, or after July 17, 2014 for offenses occurring before, on, or after July 17, 2014.

Sec. 33.16.160.
Change in parole conditions.

Upon application of the state or the parolee, the board may change a condition of parole previously imposed under AS

33.16.150(b)

.

If the proposed change in conditions of parole is more restrictive of a parolee’s liberty, the parolee is entitled to notice of the proposed change, the reasons for the proposed change, a hearing before the board, and an opportunity to respond to the proposed change and to present evidence.

Notwithstanding (a) and (b) of this section, when a parole officer determines that an emergency situation requires an immediate change in a condition of parole, or the imposition of a new condition, the parole officer may impose the change or new condition immediately, without a hearing. The parole officer shall immediately notify the board of the imposition of the emergency change or new condition and shall provide a written report setting out the basis for the change or new condition and the nature of the emergency. The effective period of a change in condition or imposition of a new condition under this subsection may not exceed 15 working days.

A condition of parole may be changed, a new condition of parole may be imposed, or a new or changed condition imposed under (c) of this section may be extended by a member of the board or the board’s designee if, after a preliminary hearing, an emergency situation is found that requires a change in condition. The effective period of a change in condition under this subsection, the imposition of a new condition under this subsection, or the extension under this subsection of a new or changed condition imposed under (c) of this section may not exceed 90 days.

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 1985)

Administrative Code. —

For conditions of parole, see 22 AAC 20, art. 5.

For hearing officers, see 22 AAC 20, art. 10.

For parole violations, see 22 AAC 20, art. 12.

Sec. 33.16.170.
Confidentiality of records and information.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, the preparole reports listed in AS

33.16.110

, and other information obtained and used by the board under this chapter, are confidential and may not be disclosed to anyone other than the board, the sentencing judge, the prosecuting and defense attorneys, the prisoner, the prisoner’s attorney, the attorney for the board, the staff of the board, or others granted access to this information under this chapter.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section and AS

33.16.130

(b), in a preparole proceeding under AS

33.16.130

the board may not disclose to the prisoner or the prisoner’s attorney

diagnostic opinions that, if made known to the eligible prisoner, could lead to serious disruption of the prisoner’s institutional program;

portions of a document that reveal sources of information obtained upon a promise of confidentiality; or

other information that, if disclosed, may result in physical harm to any other person.

When the board withholds information from a prisoner or the prisoner’s attorney under (b) of this section, the board shall provide the prisoner with an excised copy of the material or summary of the material withheld containing as much specificity as the circumstances allow.

Except for portions containing personal medical, mental health, or substance abuse treatment information or information that is otherwise required to be kept confidential by state or federal law, decisions of the board, orders for parole, and parole conditions imposed by the board are not confidential. The board shall post all decisions, orders of parole, and conditions imposed on a publicly available Internet website with any confidential portions redacted.

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 1985; am § 112 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Administrative Code. —

For attendance and appearance at parole board adjudicatory hearings, see 22 AAC 20, art. 2.

For parole progress reports, see 22 AAC 20, art. 3.

For discretionary parole release hearings, see 22 AAC 20, art. 4.

For recording of hearings, see 22 AAC 20, art. 11.

For parole violations, see 22 AAC 20, art. 12.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, added (d).

Editor's notes. —

Section 142(f),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the enactment of (d) of this section applies “to parole ordered on or after July 9, 2019, for conduct occurring on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 33.16.180.
Duties of the commissioner.

The commissioner shall

conduct investigations of prisoners eligible for discretionary parole, as requested by the board and as provided in this section;

supervise the conduct of parolees;

appoint and assign parole officers and personnel;

notify the board and provide information on a prisoner 120 days before the prisoner’s mandatory release date, if the prisoner is to be released on mandatory parole;

maintain records, files, and accounts as requested by the board;

prepare preparole reports under AS

33.16.110(a)

;

notify the board in writing of a prisoner’s compliance or noncompliance with the prisoner’s case plan created under AS

33.30.011(a)(8)

not less than 30 days before the prisoner’s next parole eligibility date or the prisoner’s parole hearing date, whichever is earlier;

establish an administrative sanction and incentive program to facilitate a swift and certain response to a parolee’s compliance with or violation of the conditions of parole and shall adopt regulations to implement the program; at a minimum, the regulations must include

a decision-making process to guide parole officers in determining the suitable response to positive and negative offender behavior that includes a list of sanctions for the most common types of negative behavior, including technical violations of conditions of parole, and a list of incentives for compliance with conditions and positive behavior that exceeds those conditions;

policies and procedures that ensure

a process for responding to negative behavior that includes a review of previous violations and sanctions;

that enhanced sanctions for certain negative conduct are approved by the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee; and

that appropriate due process protections are included in the process, including notice of negative behavior, an opportunity to dispute the accusation and the sanction, and an opportunity to request a review of the accusation and the sanction; and

within 30 days after sentencing of an offender, provide the victim of a crime information on the earliest dates the offender could be released on furlough, probation, or parole, including deductions or reductions for good time or other good conduct incentives, and the process for release, including contact information for the decision-making bodies.

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 1985; am § 141 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 61 ch 1 4SSLA 2017)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(p)(1), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For eligibility for discretionary parole, see 22 AAC 20, art. 1.

For attendance and appearance at parole board adjudicatory hearings, see 22 AAC 20, art. 2.

For parole progress reports, see 22 AAC 20, art. 3.

For discretionary parole release hearings, see 22 AAC 20, art. 4.

For parole violations, see 22 AAC 20, art. 12.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (1), inserted “administrative or” following “eligible for”; inserted “and as provided in this section” following “by the board”; in (4), inserted “administrative parole under AS

33.16.089

or” preceding “discretionary parole”; added (7), (8), (9) and (10); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in (1), deleted “administrative or” preceding “discretionary parole”; deleted (4), relating to information on prisoners eligible for administrative or discretionary parole; made related changes.

Sec. 33.16.190.
Authority of parole, pretrial services, and probation officers.

An officer appointed by the commissioner under AS

33.05.020(a)

, AS 33.07, or this chapter, may discharge duties under AS 33.05, AS 33.07, or this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 1985; am § 19 ch 22 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective June 15, 2018, twice inserted “, AS 33.07” and made a stylistic change.

Sec. 33.16.200.
Custody of parolee.

Except as provided in AS

33.16.210

, the board retains custody of special medical, discretionary, and mandatory parolees until the expiration of the maximum term or terms of imprisonment to which the parolee is sentenced.

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 1985; am § 9 ch 70 SLA 1995; am § 142 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 62 ch 1 4SSLA 2017)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(m)(14), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For discretionary parole release procedures, see 22 AAC 20, art. 6.

For special medical parole, see 22 AAC 20, art. 15.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, inserted “administrative,” following “special medical,”.

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, deleted “administrative,” following “special medical,”.

Sec. 33.16.210.
Discharge of parolee.

The board may unconditionally discharge a parolee from the jurisdiction and custody of the board after the parolee has completed one year of parole. A discretionary parolee with a residual period of probation may, after one year of parole, be discharged by the board to immediately begin serving the residual period of probation.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the board may unconditionally discharge a mandatory parolee before the parolee has completed one year of parole if the parolee is serving a concurrent period of residual probation under AS

33.20.040(c)

, and the period of residual probation and the period of suspended imprisonment each equal or exceed the period of mandatory parole.

At the discretion of a parole officer, a parole officer may recommend to the board early discharge for a parolee who

has completed at least one year on parole;

has completed all treatment programs required as a condition of parole;

is currently in compliance with all conditions of parole for all of the cases for which the person is on parole; and

has not been convicted of

an unclassified felony offense under AS 11;

a sexual felony as defined in AS

12.55.185

; or

a crime involving domestic violence as defined in AS

18.66.990

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 1985; am §§ 4, 5 ch 77 SLA 1987; am §§
143, 144 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 113 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(p)(2) and (3), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For discharge from parole, see 22 AAC 20, art. 8.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a), substituted “one year” for “two years” in two places; in (b) substituted “one year” for “two years”; added (c).

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, rewrote the introductory paragraph (c), which read, “A parole officer shall recommend to the board early discharge for a parolee who”, and rewrote (c)(3), which read, “has not been found in violation of conditions of parole by the board for at least one year; and”.

Editor's notes. —

Section 142(f), ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the amendment of (c) of this section applies “to parole ordered on or after July 9, 2019, for conduct occurring on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 33.16.215.
Sanctions for technical violations and other violations of parole.

History.

[Repealed, § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019.]

Sec. 33.16.220.
Revocation of parole.

The board may revoke parole if the prisoner or parolee (1) engages in conduct in violation of AS

33.16.150(a)

, (b), or (f), or (2) has violated an order of the court to participate in or comply with the treatment plan of a rehabilitation program under AS

12.55.015(a)(10)

. Mandatory parole may be revoked before a prisoner’s actual release on parole.

Except as provided in (e) of this section, within 15 working days after the arrest and incarceration of a parolee for violation of a condition of parole, the board or its designee shall hold a preliminary hearing. At the preliminary hearing, the board or its designee shall determine if there is probable cause to believe that the parolee violated the conditions of parole and, when probable cause exists, whether the parolee should be released pending a final revocation hearing. A finding of probable cause at a preliminary hearing in a criminal case is conclusive proof of probable cause that a parole violation occurred.

In determining whether a parole violator should be released pending a final revocation hearing, the board or its designee shall consider

the likelihood of the parolee’s appearance at a final revocation hearing;

the seriousness of the alleged violation;

whether the parolee presents a danger to the community;

whether the parolee is likely to further violate conditions of parole; and

whether the parolee is on parole for a crime involving domestic violence; if the violation of the condition of parole involved an act of domestic violence, the parolee may not be released pending the final revocation hearing.

If the parole violator is released pending a final revocation hearing, the board or its designee may impose additional conditions necessary to ensure the parolee’s appearance at the final revocation hearing, and to prevent further violation of conditions of parole.

A preliminary hearing under (b) of this section is not required if the board holds a final revocation hearing within 20 working days after the parolee’s arrest and incarceration.

If a parolee has had a preliminary hearing under (b) of this section, the board shall hold a final revocation hearing not later than 120 days after a parolee’s arrest, subject to restrictions arising under AS

33.36.110

and (g) of this section.

When the basis for the revocation proceeding is a criminal charge, the parolee may request, or the board upon its own motion may propose, that further proceedings on the revocation be delayed. In making the determination to delay further proceedings, the board shall consider prejudice that may result to the parolee’s and the state’s interests in the pending criminal case and the parolee’s decision to delay final revocation proceedings. If good cause to proceed is found, the board shall consult with the attorney general before continuing the final revocation proceeding.

At a final revocation hearing, a violation of a condition of parole must be established by a preponderance of the evidence.

If, after the final revocation hearing, the board finds that the parolee has violated a condition of parole imposed under AS

33.16.150(a)

, (b), or (f), or a law or ordinance, the board may revoke all or a portion of the remaining period of parole or change any condition of parole. A parolee’s period of parole is tolled from the date of filing with the parole board of a violation report until the date of the final revocation hearing.

[Repealed, § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019.]

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 1985; am § 10 ch 188 SLA 1990; am §§ 53, 54 ch 64 SLA 1996; am §§ 8, 9 ch 95 SLA 1998; am §§
146 — 149 ch 36 SLA 2016; am §§
114, 115, 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(p)(5) - (8), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to the applicability of subsection (i) “to decisions of the Board of Parole issued before January 1, 2017”, see sec. 30(a),
ch. 13, SLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For mandatory parole release and revocation, see 22 AAC 20, art. 7.

For parole violations, see 22 AAC 20, art. 12.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (b), inserted “, other than a technical violation under AS

33.16.215

” following “condition of parole”; in (f), substituted “If a parolee has had a preliminary hearing under (b) of this section, the” for “The” at the beginning of the subsection; substituted “not” for “no”; in (i), inserted “remaining period of” following “portion of the”; inserted “subject to the limits set out in AS

33.16.215

” preceding “or change any”; and added the following two sentences to the end of the subsection: “A parolee's period of parole is tolled from the date of filing with the parole board of a violation report for absconding and the date of the parolee's arrest, if the parole board finds, after a hearing, that the parolee violated parole by absconding, as defined in AS 33.16.215(f). The board may not extend the period of parole beyond the maximum release date calculated by the department on the parolee's original sentence plus any time that has been tolled as described in this section.”; added (j).

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, in (b), deleted “, other than a technical violation under AS 33.16. 215” following “condition of parole” in the first sentence; in (i), deleted “subject to the limits set out in AS

33.16.215

,” following “remaining period of parole” in the first sentence, and substituted “until the date of the final revocation hearing” for “for absconding and the date of the parolee’s arrest, if the parole board finds, after a hearing, that the parolee violated parole by absconding, as defined in AS

33.16.215

(f)”, and deleted the former third sentence, which read, “The board may not extend the period of parole beyond the maximum release date calculated by the department on the parolee’s original sentence plus any time that has been tolled as described in this section.”; and repealed (j).

Editor's notes. —

Section 142(g),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendments to (b) and (i) of this section apply “to parole ordered before, on, or after July 9, 2019, for conduct occurring on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 33.16.230.
Waiver of hearing.

A prisoner or parolee may waive the right to a hearing provided under AS

33.16.130

,

33.16.160

, or

33.16.220

by submitting a written waiver to the board.

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 1985; am § 37 ch 30 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For discretionary parole release hearings, see 22 AAC 20, art. 4.

For conditions of parole, see 22 AAC 20, art. 5.

For parole violations, see 22 AAC 20, art. 12.

Sec. 33.16.240.
Arrest of parole violator.

A parolee may be arrested, with or without a warrant, for a violation of parole.

A warrant for the arrest of a parolee who is charged with a violation of parole may be issued by the board, or a member of the board, based on probable cause that a violation has occurred.

In addition to the powers granted to a police officer under (g) of this section, a parole officer may, without a warrant, arrest a parolee for a violation of parole only if there is danger to the public, if there is a likelihood that the parolee will flee, or if the parolee committed a crime in the presence of the parole officer.

If a parolee is arrested without a warrant, the parole officer shall notify the board no later than the working day immediately following the arrest. The parole officer shall, within five working days after the arrest, provide the board with a written report setting out the alleged violation and circumstances that required immediate arrest of the parolee.

A parolee arrested for violation of parole is not entitled to bail.

Time spent in custody pending revocation proceedings shall be credited toward the unexpired term of imprisonment of the parolee; however, the time the parolee was at liberty on parole does not alter the time the parolee was sentenced to serve.

At any time within the period of parole supervision, a police officer certified by the Alaska Police Standards Council may detain a parolee if the officer has reasonable suspicion that the person has recently violated or may imminently violate a parole condition relating to one of the topics set out in AS

33.05.070(d)

. The officer may also arrest the parolee without a warrant if the officer has probable cause to believe that the person has violated a parole condition relating to one of the topics set out in AS

33.05.070(d)

.

[Repealed, § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019.]

The board or its designee may impose additional conditions necessary to ensure the parolee’s appearance at a hearing held under AS

33.16.220(h)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 1985; am §§ 30, 31 ch 2 SLA 2005; am § 150 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(p)(9), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For mandatory parole release and revocation, see 22 AAC 20, art. 7.

For parole violations, see 22 AAC 20, art. 12.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, added (h), and (i).

The 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, repealed (h).

Sec. 33.16.250.
Execution of warrant for arrest of parolee.

A parole officer, or a peace officer acting at the request of a parole officer, shall execute a warrant issued under AS

33.16.240

by arresting the parolee and confining the parolee in a correctional facility designated by the commissioner.

The parole officer or peace officer shall immediately notify the board or a member of the board of an arrest under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 1985)

Sec. 33.16.260.
Designation of victims’ representative.

If more than one person who qualifies as a victim under AS

12.55.185

requests notice under this chapter, the commissioner shall designate one person for purposes of receiving the notice required and exercising the rights granted by this chapter.

History.

(§ 17 ch 59 SLA 1989)

Revisor’s notes. —

Former AS

33.16.260

was renumbered as AS

33.16.900

in 1986.

Administrative Code. —

For discretionary parole release hearings, see 22 AAC 20, art. 4.

For mandatory parole release and revocation, see 22 AAC 20, art. 7.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Under this section, all family members who meet the statutory definition of “victim” in this chapter are entitled to be present during all parole board hearings concerning the perpetrator and to comment on the proposed board action. May 24, 1996, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 33.16.270.
Earned compliance credits.

The commissioner shall establish by regulation a program allowing parolees to earn credits for complying with the conditions of parole. The earned compliance credits reduce the period of parole. Nothing in this section prohibits the department from recommending to the board the early discharge of the parolee as provided in this chapter. At a minimum, the regulations must

require that a parolee earn a credit of 10 days for each 30-day period served in which the parolee complied with the conditions of parole;

include policies and procedures for

calculating and tracking credits earned by parolees;

reducing the parolee’s period of parole based on credits earned by the parolee and notifying a victim under AS

33.30.013

;

require that a parolee convicted of a crime involving domestic violence complete all treatment programs required as a condition of parole before discharge based on credits earned under this section.

A parolee may not earn credits under (a) of this section if the parolee is on parole for

an unclassified felony;

a sex offense as defined in AS

12.63.100

;

a felony crime against a person under AS 11.41;

a crime involving domestic violence, as defined in AS

18.66.990

, that is an offense under AS 11.41.

History.

(§ 151 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 63 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am §§
116, 117 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(p)(10), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to the applicability of this section "to credit for time served on parole before January 1, 2017", see sec. 30(b), ch. 13, SLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2017 amendment to this section, see sec. 75(a)(24), ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, added (3), and made a related change.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, in (a)(1), substituted “10 days” for “30 days”, and in (a)(3), deleted “a sex offense as defined in AS

12.63.100

or” following “parolee convicted of”; and added (b).

Effective dates. —

Section 190, ch. 36, SLA 2016 made this section effective January 1, 2017.

Editor's notes. —

Section 142(g),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendments to this section apply “to parole ordered before, on, or after July 9, 2019, for conduct occurring on or after July 9, 2019.”